Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201671-541
Immunization information system; immunization information; access; fee.

Any person or entity authorized under
section 71-541.01 to access immunization information in the immunization
information system established pursuant to section 71-541.01 may access such
information pursuant to rules and regulations of the Department of Health
and Human Services for purposes of direct patient care, public health activities,
or enrollment in school or child care services. The unrestricted
immunization information shared may include, but is not limited to, the patient's
name and date of birth, the dates and vaccine types
administered, and any immunization information obtained from other sources. A person or entity listed in section
71-539 which provides immunization information to a licensed child care program,
a school, or a postsecondary educational institution may charge a reasonable
fee to recover the cost of providing such immunization information.

Laws 1998, LB 1063, § 13;

Laws 2000, LB 1115, § 25;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 34;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 398;

Laws 2011, LB591, § 9.